src/orthography/Latq-to-Teng.xfscript
! Script for Latin to Tengwar for Quenya

! character sets
define VowelShort   [a | e | i | o | u];
define VowelLong    [á | é | í | ó | ú];
define Vowel [ VowelShort | VowelLong ];
define ConsonantsLongCarrierable [
     |  |  |  |
     |  |  | 
];
define InputAlphabet [q|w|%{w%}|e|é|r|t|y|u|ú|i|í|o|ó|ö|p|a|á|s|þ|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|z|x|c|v|b|n|ñ|m];
define OutputAlphabet [|||||||||||||||||||||||||||||||||||||||‍||||||||];
define FullAlphabet [InputAlphabet|OutputAlphabet];
define WordBoundary [\FullAlphabet | .#.];


! replacements


! start by getting rid of flag diacritics, then making everything lowercase
! define DeleteFlagsRule [
!     "@U.AdjSup.TRUE@" -> 0 , "@U.AdjSup.FALSE@" -> 0 ,
!     "@U.Case.Voc@" -> 0 , "@R.Case.Voc@" -> 0 , "@D.Case.Voc@" -> 0 ,
!     "@U.Tense.Perf@" -> 0 , "@R.Tense.Perf@" -> 0 , "@D.Tense.Perf@" -> 0 ,
!     "@U.Perf.NoPrefix@" -> 0 , "@U.Perf.YesPrefix@" -> 0
! ];
define Decapitation [
    A -> a , Á -> á , Ä -> ä ,
    B -> b , C -> c , D -> d ,
    E -> e , É -> é , Ë -> ë ,
    F -> f , G -> g , H -> h ,
    I -> i , Í -> í , Ï -> ï ,
    J -> j , K -> k , L -> l , M -> m , N -> n ,
    O -> o , Ó -> ó , Ö -> ö ,
    P -> p , Q -> q , R -> r , S -> s , T -> t ,
    U -> u , Ú -> ú , Ü -> ü ,
    V -> v , W -> w , X -> x , Y -> y , Z -> z
];

! remove the diaeresis
define RemoveDiaeresis [ä -> a , ë -> e , ï -> i , ö -> o , ü -> u];



! get rid of things that look like vowels, but are parts of consonants
define ConsonantQuRule1 [ {nqu} ->  , {ñqu} ->  ];
define ConsonantQuRule2 [ {qu} ->  ];

define DiphthongsRule [
    {ai} -> {} , {oi} -> {} , {ui} -> {} ,
    {au} -> {} , {eu} -> {} , {iu} -> {}
];

! if a vowel is immediately after a diphthong, it gets a carrier
define VowelAfterDiphthongRule [
    a -> {} , e -> {} , i -> {} , o -> {} , u -> {} ,
    á -> {} , é -> {} , í -> {} , ó -> {} , ú -> {}
    || [|] ? _
];

! if after diphthongs there are still two vowels in a row, the second one gets a carrier
define SecondVowelRule [
    a -> {} , e -> {} , i -> {} , o -> {} , u -> {} ,
    á -> {} , é -> {} , í -> {} , ó -> {} , ú -> {}
    || Vowel _
];

! all initial vowels get carriers
define InitialVowelRule [
    a -> {} , e -> {} , i -> {} , o -> {} , u -> {} ,
    á -> {} , é -> {} , í -> {} , ó -> {} , ú -> {}
    || WordBoundary _
];

define InitialHallaRule [ h ->  || WordBoundary _ [l|r] ];

define ConsonantPalatalRule [
    {ny} -> {} , {ñy} -> {} , {my} -> {} , {ty} -> {} ,
    {ly} -> {} , {ry} -> {} , {hy} -> 
];

define ConsonantTripleComboRule [ {ngw} ->  , {ñgw} ->  ];
define InitialNWRule [ {nw} ->  , {ñw} ->  || WordBoundary _ ];
define ConsonantDoubleComboRule [
    {nt} ->  , {nd} ->  ,
    {mp} ->  , {mb} ->  ,
    {nc} ->  , {ñc} ->  , {ng} ->  , {ñg} ->  ,
    {hw} ->  ,
    {rd} ->  , {ld} ->  ,
    {ch} ->  ,
    {cc} -> {} , {ll} -> {} , {mm} -> {} , {nn} -> {} ,
    {pp} -> {} , {rr} -> {} , {tt} -> {} , {þþ} -> {}
];

define RRule [ r ->  || _ Vowel ];

define ConsonantSimpleRule [
    t ->  , p ->  , c ->  ,
    þ ->  , f ->  , h ->  ,  ! TODO: is this right for plain h? What if it's initial?
    n ->  , m ->  , ñ ->  ,
    r ->  , v ->  , y -> {} ,
    %{w%} ->  , w ->  ,
    l ->  , x -> {}
];

define DoubleSDownRule    [ {ss} ->  || _ VowelShort ];
define DoubleSUpRule      [ {ss} ->  ];
define HookSRule1 [ s ->  || [|||||||||||] _ ];  ! left hook for left-facing bows
define HookSRule2 [ s ->  || [|||||||||||] _ ];  ! right hook for right-facing bows
define SingleSDownRule    [ s ->  || _ VowelShort ];
define SingleSUpRule      [ s ->  ];

define LongVowelRule [
    á -> {} , é -> {} , í -> {} ,
    ó -> {} , ú -> {}
];

define LongCarrierMerge [  -> {‍} || ConsonantsLongCarrierable _ ];

define VowelSimpleRule [ a ->  , e ->  , i ->  , o ->  , u ->  ];

define DeleteHyphenRule [%- -> 0];

define PunctuationRule [
    %, -> ⸱ , %. -> ":" , %; -> ":" ,
    %! ->  , %? ->  ,
    %( ->  , %) -> 
];

! TODO: digits/numbers?


! final answer
read regex [
!     DeleteFlagsRule             .o.
    Decapitation                .o.
    RemoveDiaeresis             .o.
    ConsonantQuRule1            .o.
    ConsonantQuRule2            .o.
    DiphthongsRule              .o.
    VowelAfterDiphthongRule     .o.
    SecondVowelRule             .o.
    InitialVowelRule            .o.
    InitialHallaRule            .o.
    ConsonantPalatalRule        .o.
    ConsonantTripleComboRule    .o.
    InitialNWRule               .o.
    ConsonantDoubleComboRule    .o.
    RRule                       .o.
    ConsonantSimpleRule         .o.
    DoubleSDownRule             .o.
    DoubleSUpRule               .o.
    HookSRule1                  .o.
    HookSRule2                  .o.
    SingleSDownRule             .o.
    SingleSUpRule               .o.
    LongVowelRule               .o.
    LongCarrierMerge            .o.
    VowelSimpleRule             .o.
    DeleteHyphenRule            .o.
    PunctuationRule
];
